Idaho, session 2026, H0701.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the Legislature to
provide certain limitations on the charging of rental application fees to
reduce the number of rental applicants who are charged such fees for rental
properties for which they are not considered.
SECTION 2. That Chapter 3, Title 55, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 55-316, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
55-316. LIMITATION ON FEES FOR RENTAL APPLICATIONS. (1) A property
owner or property manager shall not charge rental application fees to more
than two (2) rental applicant households per rental unit concurrently and
may charge such fees only if the property owner or property manager:
(a) Has a rental unit currently available for rent, has a rental unit
that will become available by a specified future date, or does not have
a rental property available but the rental applicant acknowledges in
writing that no rental property is available and consents to being
placed on a waiting list for future available rental units;
(b) Discloses to the prospective tenant, prior to accepting the rental
application, any information regarding the rental applicant screening
process that the property owner or property manager will evaluate as a
condition of accepting the rental applicant as a tenant in the residen-
tial unit; and
(c) Completes the screening process as disclosed pursuant to paragraph
(b) of this subsection.
(2) Rental application fees may only be charged to each rental appli-
cant within a rental applicant household who requires a criminal history and
background check.
(3) If the rental application of the first of the two (2) rental ap-
plicant households pursuant to subsection (1) of this section is denied, a
property owner or property manager may charge a rental application fee to the
next rental applicant household and may charge a rental application fee to
each individual rental applicant of such household who requires a criminal
history and background check, as long as no more than two (2) rental appli-
cant households are being charged concurrently at any given time.


(4) All rental application fees shall be related to the average costs of
the screening as disclosed pursuant to subsection (1)(b) of this section and
any other costs incurred from processing the rental application.
(5) This section shall not apply where a property owner or property man-
ager does not charge or receive rental application fees.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.